sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 hapanofumo . 
PFX A 0 hapanogaro . 
PFX A 0 hapanogo . 
PFX A 0 hapanoisvo . 
PFX A 0 hapanombo . 
PFX A 0 hapanondo . 
PFX A 0 hapanongo . 
PFX A 0 hapanonguno . 
PFX A 0 hapanono . 
PFX A 0 hapanonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 hapanonyatso . 
PFX A 0 hapanosi . 
PFX A 0 hapanosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 hapanosviko . 
PFX A 0 hapanoswero . 
PFX A 0 hapanoto . 
PFX A 0 hapanowanzo . 
PFX A 0 hapanozai . 
PFX A 0 hapanozo . 
PFX A 0 hapanyanyo . 
PFX A 0 hapanyatso . 
PFX A 0 hapapa . 
PFX A 0 hapari . 
PFX A 0 haparu . 
PFX A 0 haparwu . 
PFX A 0 hapasaka . 
PFX A 0 hapasi . 
PFX A 0 hapasvikiro . 
PFX A 0 hapasviko . 
PFX A 0 hapaswero . 
PFX A 0 hapati . 
PFX A 0 hapato . 
PFX A 0 hapatu . 
PFX A 0 hapatwu . 
PFX A 0 hapau . 
PFX A 0 hapava . 
PFX A 0 hapawa . 
PFX A 0 hapawanzo . 
PFX A 0 hapazai . 
PFX A 0 hapazo . 
PFX A 0 hapazvi . 
PFX A 0 haraido . 
PFX A 0 haraifano . 
PFX A 0 haraifumo . 
PFX A 0 haraigaro . 
PFX A 0 haraigo . 
PFX A 0 haraiisvo . 
PFX A 0 haraimbo . 
PFX A 0 haraindo . 
PFX A 0 haraingo . 
PFX A 0 harainguno . 
PFX A 0 haraino . 
PFX A 0 harainyanyo . 
PFX A 0 harainyatso . 
PFX A 0 haraisi . 
PFX A 0 haraisvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haraisviko . 
PFX A 0 haraiswero . 
PFX A 0 haraito . 
PFX A 0 haraiwanzo . 
PFX A 0 haraizai . 
PFX A 0 haraizo . 
PFX A 0 hari/Y . 
PFX A 0 haria . 
PFX A 0 haricha . 
PFX A 0 harichado . 
PFX A 0 harichafano . 
PFX A 0 harichafumo . 
PFX A 0 harichagaro . 
PFX A 0 harichago . 
PFX A 0 harichaisvo . 
PFX A 0 harichambo . 
PFX A 0 harichando . 
PFX A 0 harichango . 
PFX A 0 harichanguno . 
PFX A 0 harichano . 
PFX A 0 harichanyanyo . 
PFX A 0 harichanyatso . 
PFX A 0 harichasi . 
PFX A 0 harichasvikiro . 
PFX A 0 harichasviko . 
PFX A 0 harichaswero . 
PFX A 0 harichato . 
PFX A 0 harichawanzo . 
PFX A 0 harichazai . 
PFX A 0 harichazo . 
PFX A 0 harichi . 
PFX A 0 harichido . 
PFX A 0 harichifano . 
PFX A 0 harichifumo . 
PFX A 0 harichigaro . 
PFX A 0 harichigo . 
PFX A 0 harichiisvo . 
PFX A 0 harichimbo . 
PFX A 0 harichindo . 
PFX A 0 harichingo . 
PFX A 0 harichinguno . 
PFX A 0 harichino . 
PFX A 0 harichinyanyo . 
PFX A 0 harichinyatso . 
PFX A 0 harichisi . 
PFX A 0 harichisvikiro . 
PFX A 0 harichisviko . 
PFX A 0 harichiswero . 
PFX A 0 harichito . 
PFX A 0 harichiwanzo . 
PFX A 0 harichizai . 
PFX A 0 harichizo . 
PFX A 0 harido . 
PFX A 0 haridoa . 
PFX A 0 haridochi . 
PFX A 0 haridodzi . 
PFX A 0 haridohu . 
PFX A 0 haridohwu . 
PFX A 0 haridoi . 
PFX A 0 haridoka . 
PFX A 0 haridoku . 
PFX A 0 haridomu . 
PFX A 0 haridondi . 
PFX A 0 haridopa . 
PFX A 0 haridori . 
PFX A 0 haridoru . 
PFX A 0 haridorwu . 
PFX A 0 haridoti . 
PFX A 0 haridotu . 
PFX A 0 haridotwu . 
PFX A 0 haridou . 
PFX A 0 haridova . 
PFX A 0 haridowa . 
PFX A 0 haridozvi . 
PFX A 0 haridzi . 
PFX A 0 harifano . 
PFX A 0 harifanoa . 
PFX A 0 harifanochi . 
PFX A 0 harifanodzi . 
PFX A 0 harifanohu . 
PFX A 0 harifanohwu . 
PFX A 0 harifanoi . 
PFX A 0 harifanoka . 
PFX A 0 harifanoku . 
PFX A 0 harifanomu . 
PFX A 0 harifanondi . 
PFX A 0 harifanopa . 
PFX A 0 harifanori . 
PFX A 0 harifanoru . 
PFX A 0 harifanorwu . 
PFX A 0 harifanoti . 
PFX A 0 harifanotu . 
PFX A 0 harifanotwu . 
PFX A 0 harifanou . 
PFX A 0 harifanova . 
PFX A 0 harifanowa . 
PFX A 0 harifanozvi . 
PFX A 0 harifumo . 
PFX A 0 harifumoa . 
PFX A 0 harifumochi . 
PFX A 0 harifumodzi . 
PFX A 0 harifumohu . 
PFX A 0 harifumohwu . 
PFX A 0 harifumoi . 
PFX A 0 harifumoka . 
PFX A 0 harifumoku . 
PFX A 0 harifumomu . 
PFX A 0 harifumondi . 
PFX A 0 harifumopa . 
PFX A 0 harifumori . 
PFX A 0 harifumoru . 
PFX A 0 harifumorwu . 
PFX A 0 harifumoti . 
PFX A 0 harifumotu . 
PFX A 0 harifumotwu . 
PFX A 0 harifumou . 
PFX A 0 harifumova . 
PFX A 0 harifumowa . 
PFX A 0 harifumozvi . 
PFX A 0 harigaro . 
PFX A 0 harigaroa . 
PFX A 0 harigarochi . 
PFX A 0 harigarodzi . 
PFX A 0 harigarohu . 
PFX A 0 harigarohwu . 
PFX A 0 harigaroi . 
PFX A 0 harigaroka . 
PFX A 0 harigaroku . 
PFX A 0 harigaromu . 
PFX A 0 harigarondi . 
PFX A 0 harigaropa . 
PFX A 0 harigarori . 
PFX A 0 harigaroru . 
PFX A 0 harigarorwu . 
PFX A 0 harigaroti . 
PFX A 0 harigarotu . 
PFX A 0 harigarotwu . 
PFX A 0 harigarou . 
PFX A 0 harigarova . 
PFX A 0 harigarowa . 
PFX A 0 harigarozvi . 
PFX A 0 harigo . 
PFX A 0 harigoa . 
PFX A 0 harigochi . 
PFX A 0 harigodzi . 
PFX A 0 harigohu . 
PFX A 0 harigohwu . 
PFX A 0 harigoi . 
PFX A 0 harigoka . 
PFX A 0 harigoku . 
PFX A 0 harigomu . 
PFX A 0 harigondi . 
PFX A 0 harigopa . 
PFX A 0 harigori . 
PFX A 0 harigoru . 
PFX A 0 harigorwu . 
PFX A 0 harigoti . 
PFX A 0 harigotu . 
PFX A 0 harigotwu . 
PFX A 0 harigou . 
PFX A 0 harigova . 
PFX A 0 harigowa . 
PFX A 0 harigozvi . 
PFX A 0 harihu . 
PFX A 0 harihwu . 
PFX A 0 harii . 
PFX A 0 hariisvo . 
PFX A 0 hariisvoa . 
PFX A 0 hariisvochi . 
PFX A 0 hariisvodzi . 
PFX A 0 hariisvohu . 
PFX A 0 hariisvohwu . 
PFX A 0 hariisvoi . 
PFX A 0 hariisvoka . 
PFX A 0 hariisvoku . 
PFX A 0 hariisvomu . 
PFX A 0 hariisvondi . 
PFX A 0 hariisvopa . 
PFX A 0 hariisvori . 
PFX A 0 hariisvoru . 
PFX A 0 hariisvorwu . 
PFX A 0 hariisvoti . 
PFX A 0 hariisvotu . 
PFX A 0 hariisvotwu . 
PFX A 0 hariisvou . 
PFX A 0 hariisvova . 
PFX A 0 hariisvowa . 
PFX A 0 hariisvozvi . 
PFX A 0 harika . 
PFX A 0 harikado . 
PFX A 0 harikafano . 
PFX A 0 harikafumo . 
PFX A 0 harikagaro . 
PFX A 0 harikago . 
PFX A 0 harikaisvo . 
PFX A 0 harikambo . 
PFX A 0 harikando . 
PFX A 0 harikango . 
PFX A 0 harikanguno . 
PFX A 0 harikano . 
PFX A 0 harikanyanyo . 
PFX A 0 harikanyatso . 
PFX A 0 harikasi . 
PFX A 0 harikasvikiro . 
PFX A 0 harikasviko . 
PFX A 0 harikaswero . 
PFX A 0 harikato . 
PFX A 0 harikawanzo . 
PFX A 0 harikazai . 
PFX A 0 harikazo . 
PFX A 0 hariku . 
PFX A 0 harimbo . 
PFX A 0 harimboa . 
PFX A 0 harimbochi . 
PFX A 0 harimbodzi . 
PFX A 0 harimbohu . 
PFX A 0 harimbohwu . 
PFX A 0 harimboi . 
PFX A 0 harimboka . 
PFX A 0 harimboku . 
PFX A 0 harimbomu . 
PFX A 0 harimbondi . 
PFX A 0 harimbopa . 
PFX A 0 harimbori . 
PFX A 0 harimboru . 
PFX A 0 harimborwu . 
PFX A 0 harimboti . 
PFX A 0 harimbotu . 
PFX A 0 harimbotwu . 
PFX A 0 harimbou . 
PFX A 0 harimbova . 
PFX A 0 harimbowa . 
PFX A 0 harimbozvi . 
PFX A 0 harimu . 
PFX A 0 harindi . 
PFX A 0 harindo . 
PFX A 0 harindoa . 
PFX A 0 harindochi . 
PFX A 0 harindodzi . 
PFX A 0 harindohu . 
PFX A 0 harindohwu . 
PFX A 0 harindoi . 
PFX A 0 harindoka . 
PFX A 0 harindoku . 
PFX A 0 harindomu . 
PFX A 0 harindondi . 
PFX A 0 harindopa . 
PFX A 0 harindori . 
PFX A 0 harindoru . 
PFX A 0 harindorwu . 
PFX A 0 harindoti . 
PFX A 0 harindotu . 
PFX A 0 harindotwu . 
PFX A 0 harindou . 
PFX A 0 harindova . 
PFX A 0 harindowa . 
PFX A 0 harindozvi . 
PFX A 0 haringa . 
PFX A 0 haringaa . 
PFX A 0 haringachi . 
PFX A 0 haringado . 
PFX A 0 haringadofano . 
PFX A 0 haringadofumo . 
PFX A 0 haringadogaro . 
PFX A 0 haringadogo . 
PFX A 0 haringadoisvo . 
PFX A 0 haringadombo . 
PFX A 0 haringadondo . 
PFX A 0 haringadongo . 
PFX A 0 haringadonguno . 
PFX A 0 haringadono . 
PFX A 0 haringadonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haringadonyatso . 
PFX A 0 haringadosi . 
PFX A 0 haringadosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haringadosviko . 
PFX A 0 haringadoswero . 
PFX A 0 haringadoto . 
PFX A 0 haringadowanzo . 
PFX A 0 haringadozai . 
PFX A 0 haringadozo . 
PFX A 0 haringadzi . 
PFX A 0 haringafano . 
PFX A 0 haringafanodo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanofumo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanogaro . 
PFX A 0 haringafanogo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanoisvo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanombo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanondo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanongo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanonguno . 
PFX A 0 haringafanono . 
PFX A 0 haringafanonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanonyatso . 
PFX A 0 haringafanosi . 
PFX A 0 haringafanosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haringafanosviko . 
PFX A 0 haringafanoswero . 
PFX A 0 haringafanoto . 
PFX A 0 haringafanowanzo . 
PFX A 0 haringafanozai . 
PFX A 0 haringafanozo . 
PFX A 0 haringafumo . 
PFX A 0 haringafumodo . 
PFX A 0 haringafumofano . 
PFX A 0 haringafumogaro . 
PFX A 0 haringafumogo . 
PFX A 0 haringafumoisvo . 
