sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
apira/AVQ
badura/AVQ
banha/AVQ
bate/AVQ
bauka/AVQ
berebeda/AVQ
bhabhaisa/AVQ
bhainda/AVQ
bhazhura/AVQ
bhenga/AVQ
bhinya/AVQ
bhonga/AVQ
bhuguka/AVQ
bhuwa/AVQ
bika/AVQ
binyauka/AVQ
biswa/AVQ
bodzi/AVQ
bondora/AVQ
bopomeka/AVQ
bubunuka/AVQ
bufurira/AVQ
bundukura/AVQ
buritsa/AVQ
bvabvadza/AVQ
bvanyidza/AVQ
bvaura/AVQ
bvinzisa/AVQ
bvokocha/AVQ
bvorongonya/AVQ
bvujumuka/AVQ
bvumbana/AVQ
bvundudza/AVQ
bvura/AVQ
bvuudza/AVQ
bwanda/AVQ
bwebweda/AVQ
bwibwima/AVQ
bwirura/AVQ
chabwaira/AVQ
chachatidza/AVQ
chakadzira/AVQ
chanja/AVQ
charidza/AVQ
chechemadza/AVQ
chechuka/AVQ
chekeya/AVQ
cheneruka/AVQ
chenuruka/AVQ
cherechedzo/AVQ
chevaira/AVQ
chikidira/AVQ
chinja/AVQ
chisidzira/AVQ
chochovara/AVQ
choronoka/AVQ
chururuka/AVQ
dadanura/AVQ
dakanura/AVQ
danha/AVQ
dasvura/AVQ
dedera/AVQ
dembedza/AVQ
dengeza/AVQ
dero/AVQ
dhabhura/AVQ
dhamaira/AVQ
dhedha/AVQ
dhiga/AVQ
dhiribhura/AVQ
dhogodha/AVQ
dhovhora/AVQ
dhundumara/AVQ
dida/AVQ
dimbuka/AVQ
diridzira/AVQ
dodyora/AVQ
dongorera/AVQ
dorongosha/AVQ
dukupa/AVQ
dunduira/AVQ
durura/AVQ
dyarura/AVQ
dyura/AVQ
dzakisana/AVQ
dzasa/AVQ
dzengaira/AVQ
dzigura/AVQ
dzikisira/AVQ
dzimurira/AVQ
dzipisa/AVQ
dzivirira/AVQ
dzokesa/AVQ
dzonyongedza/AVQ
dzumbunuka/AVQ
dzurura/AVQ
dzvanyidzira/AVQ
dzvisa/AVQ
dzvurisa/AVQ
edzesera/AVQ
endedzana/AVQ
enzera/AVQ
ezera/AVQ
faima/AVQ
fananidza/AVQ
fanzaira/AVQ
farutsa/AVQ
fefa/AVQ
fekesheka/AVQ
femu/AVQ
fengudza/AVQ
fesa/AVQ
feya-feya/AVQ
finyamisa/AVQ
fisha/AVQ
foma/AVQ
fongora/AVQ
foshoka/AVQ
fufudzira/AVQ
fukidza/AVQ
fumura/AVQ
fungirana/AVQ
furete/AVQ
futira/AVQ
gachira/AVQ
gaharira/AVQ
ganyisa/AVQ
gegeredza/AVQ
gofa/AVQ
gondeka/AVQ
gubudika/AVQ
gumadza/AVQ
gundika/AVQ
gururudza/AVQ
gwadagwadza/AVQ
gwavarira/AVQ
gwesha/AVQ
handaira/AVQ
horesa/AVQ
hwazhama/AVQ
ika/AVQ
iyana/AVQ
javhura/AVQ
jogonya/AVQ
kachikira/AVQ
kakashara/AVQ
kanavheta/AVQ
kanhiyo/AVQ
karanhuka/AVQ
katana/AVQ
kemba/AVQ
kobvuka/AVQ
kohovedza/AVQ
komborera/AVQ
konorera/AVQ
kororodza/AVQ
kotsora/AVQ
kuhuna/AVQ
kumikidza/AVQ
kunyana/AVQ
kuruzura/AVQ
kuwurira/AVQ
kwakwamura/AVQ
kwarakwasha/AVQ
kwebedeka/AVQ
kweseka/AVQ
kwindimara/AVQ
man'ara/AVQ
mata/AVQ
mbumutsa/AVQ
menya/AVQ
mhiza/AVQ
modora/AVQ
movera/AVQ
mviriridza/AVQ
mwayanga/AVQ
nakidza/AVQ
nanavadza/AVQ
natsiridza/AVQ
ndeyesa/AVQ
ndutidza/AVQ
nengetedza/AVQ
ngeda/AVQ
nguma-nguma/AVQ
ngwandura/AVQ
nhasin'a/AVQ
nimbura/AVQ
njanjaridza/AVQ
njokotedza/AVQ
n'udura/AVQ
nyahwaidza/AVQ
nyangaira/AVQ
nyashira/AVQ
nyengetera/AVQ
nyevenura/AVQ
nyofura/AVQ
nyukura/AVQ
nzonzota/AVQ
nzwii/AVQ
ona/AVQ
otsa/AVQ
paipa/AVQ
pamhadura/AVQ
pangamura/AVQ
para/AVQ
pasicharaiza/AVQ
pazhaura/AVQ
penenguka/AVQ
perengera/AVQ
peyama/AVQ
pfava/AVQ
pfigirana/AVQ
pfokocheka/AVQ
pfuka/AVQ
pfumvumadza/AVQ
pfupa/AVQ
pfutuka/AVQ
pikita/AVQ
pingiridza/AVQ
pirimuka/AVQ
podera/AVQ
pononga/AVQ
povora/AVQ
pumhuruka/AVQ
pupumisa/AVQ
putanidza/AVQ
pwasharara/AVQ
rabura/AVQ
rambanyn'uka/AVQ
rapira/AVQ
ravadzana/AVQ
rekera/AVQ
repesa/AVQ
ribura/AVQ
ringa/AVQ
rodzesa/AVQ
ropota/AVQ
rozomora/AVQ
runga/AVQ
rwera/AVQ
sakadza/AVQ
sanyura/AVQ
secha/AVQ
sengerera/AVQ
shadabura/AVQ
shandikira/AVQ
shatirira/AVQ
shevedzera/AVQ
shishinwa/AVQ
shonopodza/AVQ
shumaira/AVQ
shuwisa/AVQ
simbira/AVQ
sitima/AVQ
sonza/AVQ
sumudza/AVQ
sununguka/AVQ
sutswa/AVQ
svaya/AVQ
svikirwa/AVQ
svodza/AVQ
svoverera/AVQ
swedza/AVQ
taipa/AVQ
tambisa/AVQ
tandavara/AVQ
tapa/AVQ
tarika/AVQ
tatsura/AVQ
teenedza/AVQ
teketseka/AVQ
tendeudza/AVQ
tepfenuka/AVQ
tetenyeka/AVQ
tiburana/AVQ
tindirika/AVQ
titidza/AVQ
tokota/AVQ
toresa/AVQ
tsamwa/AVQ
tsaukana/AVQ
tsengerera/AVQ
tsikinya/AVQ
tsinza/AVQ
tsokonyedza/AVQ
tsukudura/AVQ
tsuridzira/AVQ
tsvanzvadzira/AVQ
tsverutsa/AVQ
tsvororodza/AVQ
tubvunyudza/AVQ
tumba/AVQ
tunhumadza/AVQ
tutidza/AVQ
twasanudza/AVQ
uchika/AVQ
undubvura/AVQ
urukira/AVQ
vakisa/AVQ
varavadza/AVQ
vengesa/AVQ
vhamira/AVQ
vhenyenga/AVQ
vhiringika/AVQ
vhumbatira/AVQ
vhuridza/AVQ
vinga/AVQ
wa/AVQ
wara/AVQ
wetsa/AVQ
wowoma/AVQ
yanika/AVQ
yerura/AVQ
zaridzwa/AVQ
zevezera/AVQ
zhezhera/AVQ
zivikana/AVQ
zungunutsa/AVQ
zvengeredza/AVQ
zvipeta/AVQ
